Louisiana, session 2026, HB387.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1574.1(C)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1574.1. Costs of handling plans
* * *
C.(1) In the event that plans do not appear to the fire marshal to satisfactorily
comply with the laws, regulations, and codes of Louisiana and the regulations of the
state fire marshal, the state fire marshal shall furnish a letter to the party submitting
the plans which shall list the particular requirements of the state fire marshal which
must be met before the plans can be stamped "Reviewed" and before construction
or renovation or remodeling can begin. However, where plans for projects are
submitted in violation of R.S. 37:155(A)(4) or R.S. 37:701(I), no list of requirements
shall be provided.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.